District of Columbia statutes.
1-129.35

Use of funds by Statehood Delegation members.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, members of the Statehood Delegation shall use New Columbia Statehood Fund monies for any expense closely and directly related to the operation of their offices.

(b)

(1)

Fund monies shall not be used by members of the Statehood Delegation for:

(A)

Campaign expenses related to any election, local or national;

(B)

To influence the outcome of any election, local or national;

(C)

Any contributions or loans to any political party or candidate for federal or non-federal office;

(D)

Any personal expenses, or travel expenses not closely and directly related to the office the member holds; or

(E)

Any personal salary or stipend for the member.

(2)

The prohibition in paragraph (1)(E) of this subsection shall not limit the ability of a member of the Statehood Delegation to pay salaries to employees other than the member, or to pay vendors providing services closely and directly related to the office the member holds.

(c)

Upon request, but at least annually, each Statehood Delegation member shall provide the Chief Financial Officer with an accounting of the expenditures made with the money received from the Fund. The date by which the accounting is due shall be set by the Chief Financial Officer. Information submitted by members of the Statehood Delegation shall be included in the report required by § 1-129.33.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 35
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884